Utah statutes.
61-2b-41.   Consultation reports -- Restrictions on use of terms.
A person who prepares a written or oral consultation report may not refer to
the consultation report as an appraisal, an appraisal report, or in any manner
that may be interpreted as referring to an appraisal or an appraisal report.
